Utah statutes.
59-10-122.   Taxable year.

(1)  For purposes of a tax imposed by this chapter, the taxable year of a resident or nonresident individual or resident or nonresident estate or trust shall be the same as the taxable year of the resident or nonresident individual or resident or nonresident estate or trust for federal income tax purposes.

(2) (a)  If the taxable year of a resident or nonresident individual or resident or nonresident estate or trust is changed for federal income tax purposes, that taxable year for purposes of a tax imposed by this chapter shall be changed in the same manner as the change for federal income tax purposes.

(b)  If a change in a taxable year results in a taxable period of less than 12 months for federal income tax purposes, that same taxable period shall be used in computing a tax imposed by this chapter.

